Utah statutes.
53-10-501.   Bureau of Communications -- Creation -- Bureau Chief appointment, qualifications, and compensation.

(1)  There is created within the division the Bureau of Communications.

(2)  The bureau shall be managed by a bureau chief selected by the division director, with the approval of the commissioner.

(3)  The bureau chief should be experienced in communications and administration, and possess additional qualifications as determined by the commissioner or division director and as provided by law.

(4)  The bureau chief acts under the supervision and control of the division director.



Enacted by Chapter 263, 1998 General Session

